Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1236
Other payments; effect on payment under act.

No payment or assistance under the Relocation Assistance Act shall be required to be made to any person or included as a program or project cost if such person receives a payment required by federal, state, or local law which is determined by the head of the displacing agency to have substantially the same purpose and effect as would the payment authorized by the act.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 23.